Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.604.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "School service" means a website, mobile application, or online service that: (a) Is designed and marketed primarily for use in a K-12 school; (b) is used at the direction of teachers or other employees of a K-12 school; and (c) collects, maintains, or uses student personal information. A "school service" does not include a website, mobile application, or online service that is designed and marketed for use by individuals or entities generally, even if also marketed to a United States K-12 school.

(2) "School service provider" means an entity that operates a school service to the extent it is operating in that capacity.

(3) "Student personal information" means information collected through a school service that personally identifies an individual student or other information collected and maintained about an individual student that is linked to information that identifies an individual student.

(4) "Students" means students of K-12 schools in Washington state.

(5) "Targeted advertising" means sending advertisements to a student where the advertisement is selected based on information obtained or inferred from that student's online behavior, usage of applications, or student personal information. It does not include (a) advertising to a student at an online location based upon that student's current visit to that location without the collection and retention of a student's online activities over time or (b) adaptive learning, personalized learning, or customized education.

[ 2015 c 277 s 2.]